Maine, session 132, LD112.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 26 MRSA §664, sub-§1-A is enacted to read:
1-A. Minimum wage for students. Notwithstanding subsection 1, for an employee
who is a secondary student the minimum hourly wage is 50% of the amount specified in
subsection 1 for a period of at least 2 years beginning with the first day of employment,
except that an employee who graduates secondary school must be paid at least a minimum
hourly wage in accordance with subsection 1.
For the purposes of this subsection, "secondary student" has the same meaning as in Title
20-A, section 1, subsection 33 and "secondary school" has the same meaning as in Title
20-A, section 1, subsection 32.